Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 10 Miscellaneous Provisions

386A.10-010.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 73, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.10-020.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter does modify, limit, and supersede the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15

U.S.C. secs. 7001

et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7001(c)

, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7003(b)

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 74, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.10-030.
Savings clause.

This chapter does not affect an action commenced, proceeding brought, or right accrued before July 12, 2012.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 75, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.10-040.
Effective date — Application to business trusts — Application to foreign business trusts.

This chapter does not limit, prohibit, or invalidate the existence, acts, or obligations of any common-law trust created or doing business in this Commonwealth before, on, or after July 12, 2012.

A business trust formed under any statute of this Commonwealth prior to July 12, 2012, until or unless it becomes a statutory trust under this chapter, shall continue to be governed by the provisions of the statute under which it was formed.

The enactment of this chapter shall not impair, or otherwise affect, the organization or the continued existence of a business trust existing on July 12, 2012.

This chapter governs only:

A statutory trust formed on or after July 12, 2012; and

A business trust formed before July 12, 2012, which elects, in the manner provided in its governing instrument or by law for amending the governing instrument, to be subject to this chapter.

A business trust formed under any statute or pursuant to the common law of this Commonwealth prior to July 12, 2012, may elect to become subject to this chapter by a consent sufficient to amend the declaration of trust or in the absence thereof by the unanimous consent of the beneficial owners. Thereafter, the business trust shall file an amended and restated certificate of trust which complies with KRS

386A.2-010

and that further sets forth:

The name of the business trust as set forth on any declaration of trust filed pursuant to KRS

386.420

or predecessor law;

The date of filing of any declaration of trust filed pursuant to KRS

386.420

or predecessor law;

An affirmative election by the business trust to be subject to this chapter; and

An affirmative statement that the election was approved as required by this subsection.

A business or statutory trust formed in a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth of Kentucky may elect to be subject to this chapter by a consent sufficient to amend the declaration of trust and trust agreement or in the absence thereof by the unanimous consent of the beneficial owners. Thereafter, the business or statutory trust shall file an amended and restated certificate of trust which complies with KRS

386A.2-010

and further sets forth:

The name of the business or statutory trust;

The previous jurisdiction of organization;

An affirmative election by the trust to be subject to this chapter; and

A statement that the election to be governed by this chapter is effective under the law and agreements governing the trust prior to becoming subject to this chapter.

An election pursuant to subsection (5) or (6) of this section is effective upon the effective time and date of the amended and restated certificate of trust as provided in KRS

14A.2-070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 76, effective July 12, 2012.